Massachusetts, session 194th, H4063.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 186 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 32. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
“Access to counsel program”, a statewide access to counsel program to provide full legal
representation to tenants in housing matters related to affordable housing units and to be funded
by a specifically dedicated general court appropriation.
“Affordable housing unit”, a dwelling unit where the rent is affordable to a household
whose annual income, adjusted for family size, is equal to or less than 80 per cent of area median
income as defined by the executive office.
“Affordable housing unit equity dashboard”, a collection of data that measures, tracks
and reports on the impact of affordable housing units in the commonwealth.
of 4

“Executive office”, the executive office of housing and livable communities.
“Landlord”, the owner, lessor or sublessor of an affordable housing unit.
“Tenant”, a person who has entered into an oral or written lease or rental agreement with
the landlord for the rental of an affordable housing unit.
(b) A landlord shall not increase the annual rent of an affordable housing unit by more
than 3.5 per cent. If the market rate for rental units owned by a landlord in the rental project
decreases, the landlord shall decrease the rent of the affordable housing unit by the percent
amount equal to the market rate decrease.
(c) If a landlord desires to increase the rent of an affordable housing unit, the landlord
shall provide a written request to the executive office and to the select board of the town or the
mayor of the city where the affordable housing unit is located at least 120 days prior to the
proposed effective date of the rent increase. The request shall include the required financial
information to support the rent increase. The city or town shall have 60 days from the receipt of
the request to provide comments to the executive office. The executive office shall issue a
written determination to the landlord approving the request, approving the request in part or
denying the request. If the request is approved in part or denied, the written determination shall
set forth the reasons therefore. The executive office shall determine the process for submission of
the rent increase and review by the executive office.
(d) The executive office shall establish an affordable housing unit equity dashboard to
document and track, in an ongoing manner, the affordable housing landscape in the
commonwealth to foster housing equity.
of 4

(e) A landlord shall not take any fees and profit distributions on an affordable housing
project that is greater than 6 per cent of the landlord’s equity in the project. A landlord shall
reinvest at least 4 per cent of fees and profit distributions back into the rental project including,
but not limited to, maintenance and unit upgrades with a proportionate share of such
reinvestment required in the affordable housing units.
(f) A tenant shall have access to free legal assistance and full representation for housing
matters related to rental of an affordable housing unit under a statewide access to counsel
program. Landlords shall not charge legal fees to tenants without court approval.
(g) Landlords shall work in good faith with tenants of affordable housing units for a 6-
month period to resolve any disputes related to non-payment of rent through housing court
mediation sessions. Landlords shall not charge fines or add administrative costs to tenants during
the 6-month cure period.
(h)(1) There shall be a task force to ensure that regulatory agreements meet current
municipal oversight needs and identify possible opportunities for additional technical assistance
to municipalities for rental unit and rental project oversight. The task force shall examine: (i) the
regulatory use agreement process and terms; (ii) increasing technical and legal support to
municipalities; (iii) improving enforcement mechanisms; and (iv) to ensure that all components
of affordable housing, rental assistance programs and other eligible housing supports are
coordinated across agencies.
(2) The task force shall consist of: (i) the secretary of the executive office or a designee,
who shall serve as chair; and (ii) 10 other persons appointed by the secretary, at least 3 of whom
shall be municipal housing officials.
of 4

(3) The task force shall submit a report of its findings, including any recommendations
for improving regulatory agreements and enforcement thereof, and proposed legislation, if any,
necessary to carry out its recommendations, to the clerks of the house of representatives and the
senate and to the house and senate committees on ways and means, not later than December 1,
2026.
of 4